test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-aamp_gt-norm.yaml
# Author: Csilla HORVATH (Szeged Team)

Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Then: run analyser, then correct.
# (20230502: Csilla)

  Noun - а̄мп: # "(eng) boat/(hun) csónak/(rus) лодка"  - full paradigm
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Nom: а̄мп
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Loc: а̄мпыт
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Lat: а̄мпын
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Abl: а̄мпныл
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Ins: а̄мпыл
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Tra: а̄мпыг

     а̄мп+N+Du+Nom: а̄мпыг
     а̄мп+N+Du+Loc: а̄мпыгт
     а̄мп+N+Du+Lat: а̄мпыгн
     а̄мп+N+Du+Abl: а̄мпыгныл
     а̄мп+N+Du+Ins: а̄мпыгтыл

     а̄мп+N+Pl+Nom: а̄мпыт
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Loc: а̄мпытт
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Lat: а̄мпытн
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Abl: а̄мпытныл
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Ins: а̄мпытыл

     а̄мп+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: а̄мпум
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: а̄мпумт
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg1: а̄мпумн
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: а̄мпумныл
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: а̄мпумтыл
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg1: а̄мпумыг

     а̄мп+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: а̄мпагум
     а̄мп+N+Du+Loc+PxSg1: а̄мпагумт
     а̄мп+N+Du+Lat+PxSg1: а̄мпагумн
     а̄мп+N+Du+Abl+PxSg1: а̄мпагумныл
     а̄мп+N+Du+Ins+PxSg1: а̄мпагумтыл

     а̄мп+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: а̄мпанум
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: а̄мпанумт
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg1: а̄мпанумн
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: а̄мпанумныл
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg1: а̄мпанумтыл

     а̄мп+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: а̄мпын
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: а̄мпынт
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg2: а̄мпынн
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: а̄мпынныл
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: а̄мпынтыл
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg2: а̄мпыныг

     а̄мп+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: [а̄мпагын, а̄мпагн]
     а̄мп+N+Du+Loc+PxSg2: а̄мпагынт
     а̄мп+N+Du+Lat+PxSg2: а̄мпагынн
     а̄мп+N+Du+Abl+PxSg2: а̄мпагынныл
     а̄мп+N+Du+Ins+PxSg2: а̄мпагынтыл

     а̄мп+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: [а̄мпанын, а̄мпан]
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: [а̄мпанынт, а̄мпант]
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg2: [а̄мпанынн, а̄мпанн]
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [а̄мпанынныл, а̄мпанныл]
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg2: [а̄мпанынтыл, а̄мпантыл]

     а̄мп+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: а̄мпе
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: [а̄мпе̄т, а̄мпет]
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg3: [а̄мпе̄н, а̄мпен]
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: [а̄мпе̄ныл, а̄мпеныл]
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: [а̄мпе̄нтыл, а̄мпентыл]
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg3: [а̄мпе̄г, а̄мпег]

     а̄мп+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: а̄мпаге
     а̄мп+N+Du+Loc+PxSg3: [а̄мпаге̄т, а̄мпагет]
     а̄мп+N+Du+Lat+PxSg3: [а̄мпаге̄н, а̄мпаген]
     а̄мп+N+Du+Abl+PxSg3: [а̄мпаге̄ныл, а̄мпагеныл]
     а̄мп+N+Du+Ins+PxSg3: [а̄мпаге̄тыл, а̄мпагетыл]

     а̄мп+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: а̄мпанэ
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: [а̄мпанэ̄т, а̄мпанэт]
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg3: [а̄мпанэ̄н, а̄мпанэн]
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [а̄мпанэ̄ныл, а̄мпанэныл]
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: [а̄мпанэ̄тыл, а̄мпанэтыл]

     а̄мп+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: [а̄мпме̄н, а̄мпмен]
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: [а̄мпме̄нт, а̄мпмент]
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Lat+PxDu1: [а̄мпме̄нн, а̄мпменн]
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [а̄мпме̄нныл, а̄мпменныл]
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Ins+PxDu1: [а̄мпме̄нтыл, а̄мпментыл]

     а̄мп+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: [а̄мпагаме̄н, а̄мпагамен, а̄мпагме̄н]
     а̄мп+N+Du+Loc+PxDu1: [а̄мпагаме̄нт, а̄мпагамент, а̄мпагме̄нт]
     а̄мп+N+Du+Lat+PxDu1: [а̄мпагаме̄нн, а̄мпагаменн, а̄мпагме̄нн]
     а̄мп+N+Du+Abl+PxDu1: [а̄мпагаме̄нныл, а̄мпагаменныл, а̄мпагме̄нныл]
     а̄мп+N+Du+Ins+PxDu1: [а̄мпагаме̄нтыл, а̄мпагаментыл, а̄мпагме̄нтыл]

     а̄мп+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: [а̄мпанаме̄н, а̄мпанамен]
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: [а̄мпанаме̄нт, а̄мпанамент]
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Lat+PxDu1: [а̄мпанаме̄нн, а̄мпанаменн]
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [а̄мпанаме̄нныл, а̄мпанаменныл]
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Ins+PxDu1: [а̄мпанаме̄нтыл, а̄мпанаментыл]

     а̄мп+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: [а̄мпын, а̄мпы̄н]
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: [а̄мпынт, а̄мпы̄нт] 
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Lat+PxDu2: [а̄мпынн, а̄мпы̄нн]
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: [а̄мпынныл, а̄мпы̄нныл]
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Ins+PxDu2: [а̄мпынтыл, а̄мпы̄нтыл]

     а̄мп+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: [а̄мпагын, а̄мпагы̄н]
     а̄мп+N+Du+Loc+PxDu2: [а̄мпагынт, а̄мпагы̄нт]
     а̄мп+N+Du+Lat+PxDu2: [а̄мпагынн, а̄мпагы̄нн]
     а̄мп+N+Du+Abl+PxDu2: [а̄мпагынныл, а̄мпагы̄нныл]
     а̄мп+N+Du+Ins+PxDu2: [а̄мпагынтыл, а̄мпагы̄нтыл]

     а̄мп+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: [а̄мпанын, а̄мпаны̄н, а̄мпан]
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: [а̄мпанынт, а̄мпаны̄нт, а̄мпант]
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Lat+PxDu2: [а̄мпанынн, а̄мпаны̄нн, а̄мпанн]
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [а̄мпанынныл, а̄мпаны̄нныл, а̄мпанныл]
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Ins+PxDu2: [а̄мпанынтыл, а̄мпаны̄нтыл, а̄мпантыл]

     а̄мп+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: [а̄мпе̄н, а̄мпен]
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: [а̄мпе̄нт, а̄мпент]
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Lat+PxDu3: [а̄мпе̄нн, а̄мпенн]
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: [а̄мпе̄нныл, а̄мпенныл]
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Ins+PxDu3: [а̄мпе̄нтыл, а̄мпентыл]

     а̄мп+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: [а̄мпаге̄н, а̄мпаген]
     а̄мп+N+Du+Loc+PxDu3: [а̄мпаге̄нт, а̄мпагент]
     а̄мп+N+Du+Lat+PxDu3: [а̄мпаге̄нн, а̄мпагенн]
     а̄мп+N+Du+Abl+PxDu3: [а̄мпаге̄нныл, а̄мпагенныл]
     а̄мп+N+Du+Ins+PxDu3: [а̄мпаге̄нтыл, а̄мпагентыл]

     а̄мп+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: [а̄мпанэ̄н, а̄мпанэн]
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: [а̄мпанэ̄нт, а̄мпанэнт]
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Lat+PxDu3: [а̄мпанэ̄нн, а̄мпанэнн]
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [а̄мпанэ̄нныл, а̄мпанэнныл]
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Ins+PxDu3: [а̄мпанэ̄нтыл, а̄мпанэнтыл]

     а̄мп+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: а̄мпув
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: а̄мпувт
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Lat+PxPl1: а̄мпувн
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: а̄мпувныл
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: а̄мпувтыл

     а̄мп+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: а̄мпагув
     а̄мп+N+Du+Loc+PxPl1: а̄мпагувт
     а̄мп+N+Du+Lat+PxPl1: а̄мпагувн
     а̄мп+N+Du+Abl+PxPl1: а̄мпагувныл
     а̄мп+N+Du+Ins+PxPl1: а̄мпагувтыл

     а̄мп+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: а̄мпанув
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: а̄мпанувт
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Lat+PxPl1: а̄мпанувн
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: а̄мпанувныл
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: а̄мпанувтыл

     а̄мп+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: [а̄мпын, а̄мпы̄н] 
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: [а̄мпынт, а̄мпы̄нт]
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Lat+PxPl2: [а̄мпынн, а̄мпы̄нн]
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: [а̄мпынныл, а̄мпы̄нныл]
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: [а̄мпынтыл, а̄мпы̄нтыл]

     а̄мп+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: [а̄мпагын, а̄мпагы̄н]
     а̄мп+N+Du+Loc+PxPl2: [а̄мпагынт, а̄мпагы̄нт]
     а̄мп+N+Du+Lat+PxPl2: [а̄мпагынн, а̄мпагы̄нн]
     а̄мп+N+Du+Abl+PxPl2: [а̄мпагынныл, а̄мпагы̄нныл]
     а̄мп+N+Du+Ins+PxPl2: [а̄мпагынтыл, а̄мпагы̄нтыл]

     а̄мп+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: [а̄мпанын, а̄мпаны̄н, а̄мпан]
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: [а̄мпанынт, а̄мпаны̄нт, а̄мпант]
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Lat+PxPl2: [а̄мпанынн, а̄мпаны̄нн, а̄мпанн]
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [а̄мпанынныл, а̄мпаны̄нныл, а̄мпанныл]
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: [а̄мпанынтыл, а̄мпаны̄нтыл, а̄мпантыл]

     а̄мп+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: а̄мпаныл
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: а̄мпанылт
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Lat+PxPl3: а̄мпанылн
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: а̄мпанылныл
     а̄мп+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: а̄мпанылтыл

     а̄мп+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: а̄мпаганыл
     а̄мп+N+Du+Loc+PxPl3: а̄мпаганылт
     а̄мп+N+Du+Lat+PxPl3: а̄мпаганылн
     а̄мп+N+Du+Abl+PxPl3: а̄мпаганылныл
     а̄мп+N+Du+Ins+PxPl3: а̄мпаганылтыл

     а̄мп+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: [а̄мпананыл, а̄мпаныл]
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: [а̄мпананылт, а̄мпанылт]
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Lat+PxPl3: [а̄мпананылн, а̄мпанылн]
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [а̄мпананылныл, а̄мпанылныл]
     а̄мп+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: [а̄мпананылтыл, а̄мпанылтыл]
